Hawaii statutes.
[§414D-34] Liability for preincorporation
transactions. All persons purporting to act as or on behalf of a
corporation, knowing there was no incorporation under this chapter, are jointly
and severally liable for all liabilities created while so acting. [L 2001, c
105, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next